District of Columbia statutes.
44-108.05

Emergency placement.

A resident admitted as an emergency placement, not to exceed 14 days, must comply with admission, physical examination, and assessment requirements of this chapter.

History

June 24, 2000, D.C. Law 13-127, § 805, 47 DCR 2647